Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB46.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 503 of the act of March 10, 1949 (P.L.30, No.14), known as the Public School Code of 1949, is amended to read:Section 503. Kindergartens.--(a) The board of school directors in [any school district may] all school districts shall establish and maintain kindergartens [for children between the ages of four and six years. When established, the]. Districts may establish an age policy, and shall not deny kindergarten to a child who is five years of age or older on the 1234567891011121314151617181920 first day of the school year. The kindergartens shall be an integral part of the elementary school system of the district, and be kept open for not less than two and one-half hours each day for the full school term as provided in section 1501.[The number of kindergartens in any one district shall be fixed by the board of school directors, and shall be open during the school year.If the average attendance in any one kindergarten in any district is ten or less for the school year, the school directors shall, at the close of the school year, discontinue the same.](b) The number of kindergartens in any one district shall be fixed by the board of school directors and shall be open during the school year. Kindergartens shall be available to all children residing in the school district who are of the age fixed under subsection (a).(c) The board of school directors shall appoint and assign a sufficient number of teachers to such kindergartens, who shall be certified in accordance with the rules and regulations prescribed by the [Council of Basic Education] State Board of Education.Section 2. The act is amended by adding a section to read:Section 503.1. Pre-Kindergarten Programs.--(a) The board of school directors in all school districts shall establish and maintain pre-kindergarten programs. The pre-kindergarten programs shall be an integral part of the elementary school system of the district and be kept open for not less than two and one-half hours each day for the full school term as provided in section 1501.(b) The number of pre-kindergarten programs in any one 20250HB0046PN0025 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 district shall be fixed by the board of school directors and shall be open during the school year.(c) The board of school directors shall appoint and assign a sufficient number of teachers to the pre-kindergarten programs who shall be certified in accordance with the regulations promulgated by the State Board of Education.Section 3. Section 1301 of the act is amended to read:Section 1301. Age Limits; Temporary Residence.--Every child, being a resident of any school district, between the ages of [six (6)] five (5) and twenty-one (21) years, may attend the public schools in his district, subject to the provisions of this act. Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary, a child who attains the age of twenty-one (21) years during the school term and who has not graduated from high school may continue to attend the public schools in [his] the district free of charge until the end of the school term. The board of school directors of any school district may admit to the schools of the district, with or without the payment of tuition, any non-resident child temporarily residing in the district, and may require the attendance of such non-resident child in the same manner and on the same conditions as it requires the attendance of a resident child.Section 4. The definition of "compulsory school age" in section 1326 of the act is amended to read:Section 1326. Definitions.--When used in this article, the following words and phrases shall have the following meanings:* * *"Compulsory school age" shall mean the period of a child's life from the time the child's parents elect to have the child enter school and which shall be no later than [six (6)] five (5) 20250HB0046PN0025 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 years of age until the child reaches [eighteen (18)] seventeen (17) years of age. The term does not include a child who holds a certificate of graduation from a regularly accredited, licensed, registered or approved high school.* * *Section 5. The amendment or addition of sections 503, 503.1 and 1301 and the definition of "compulsory school age" in section 1326 of the act shall apply to the academic year following the effective date of this section and each academic year thereafter.Section 6. This act shall take effect in 90 days.20250HB0046PN0025 - 4 - 1234567891011